Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska34-201
Preservation during construction and other work.

It shall be the duty of every individual or corporation engaged either directly or indirectly in the construction of any irrigation ditch, drainage ditch, railroad, side track or spur track, or any other construction, or in any other activity whatsoever, that endangers or may endanger or may cause the loss or destruction of any landmark or corner of land surveys or boundaries, to employ the county surveyor of the county wherein they are situated to properly perpetuate or witness said landmarks and corners according to law.

Laws 1929, c. 129, § 1, p. 479;

C.S.1929, § 34-201;

R.S.1943, § 34-201.